Missouri, session 2026, HB1637.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 197.300, 197.305, 197.310, 197.311, 197.312, 197.315, 197.316,
197.318, 197.320, 197.325, 197.326, 197.327, 197.330, 197.335, 197.340, 197.345, 197.355,
197.357, 197.366, 197.367, 197.705, 198.530, 208.169, and 208.225, RSMo, are repealed and
four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 197.705, 198.530, 208.169,
and 208.225, to read as follows:
197.705. 1. For purposes of this section, the term "health care facilities" means:
(1) Facilities licensed under chapter 198;
(2) Long-term care beds in a hospital as described in subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 198.012; and
(3) Long-term care hospitals or beds in a long-term care hospital meeting the
requirements described in 42 CFR 412.23(e).
2. All hospitals, as defined in section 197.020, and health care facilities[, defined in
sections 197.020 and 197.305,] shall require all personnel providing services in such facilities
to wear identification badges while acting within the scope of their employment. The
identification badges of all personnel shall prominently display the licensure status of such
personnel.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1637 2
198.530. 1. For purposes of this section, the term "continuing care retirement
community" means a community that provides at the same site or location independent
housing, long-term health care, and other services to older persons not related by blood
or marriage to the owner or operator of the community under an agreement effective
for the life of the person or a specified period of time in excess of one year that
guarantees or provides priority access to on-site health-related long-term care services
when needed.
2. If an enrollee in a managed care organization is also a resident in a long-term care
facility licensed pursuant to chapter 198, or a continuing care retirement community[, as
defined in section 197.305], such enrollee's managed care organization shall provide the
enrollee with the option of receiving the covered service in the long-term care facility which
serves as the enrollee's primary residence. For purposes of this section, "managed care
organization" means any organization that offers any health plan certified by the department
of health and senior services designed to provide incentives to medical care providers to
manage the cost and use of care associated with claims, including, but not limited to, a health
maintenance organization and preferred provider organization. The resident enrollee's
managed care organization shall reimburse the resident facility for those services which
would otherwise be covered by the managed care organization if the following conditions
apply:
(1) The facility is willing and able to provide the services to the resident; and
(2) The facility and those health care professionals delivering services to residents
pursuant to this section meet the licensing and training standards as prescribed by law; and
(3) The facility is certified through Medicare; and
(4) The facility and those health care professionals delivering services to residents
pursuant to this section agree to abide by the terms and conditions of the health carrier's
contracts with similar providers, abide by patient protection standards and requirements
imposed by state or federal law for plan enrollees and meet the quality standards established
by the health carrier for similar providers.
[2.] 3. The managed care organization shall reimburse the resident facility at a rate of
reimbursement not less than the Medicare allowable rate pursuant to Medicare rules and
regulations.
[3.] 4. The services in subsection [1] 2of this section shall include, but are not limited
to, skilled nursing care, rehabilitative and other therapy services, and postacute care, as
needed. Nothing in this section shall limit the managed care organization from utilizing
contracted providers to deliver the services in the enrollee's resident facility.
[4.] 5. A resident facility shall not prohibit a health carrier's participating providers
from providing covered benefits to an enrollee in the resident facility. A resident facility or

HB 1637 3
health care professional shall not impose any charges on an enrollee for any service that is
ancillary to, a component of, or in support of the services provided under this section when
the services are provided by a health carrier's participating provider, or otherwise create a
disincentive for the use of the health carrier's participating providers. Any violation of the
requirements of this subsection by the resident facility shall be considered abuse or neglect of
the resident enrollee.
208.169. [1.] Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, including but not
limited to sections 208.152, 208.153, 208.159 and 208.162[:
(1) There shall be no revisions to a facility's reimbursement rate for providing nursing
care services under this chapter upon a change in ownership, management control, operation,
stock, leasehold interests by whatever form for any facility previously licensed or certified for
participation in the Medicaid program. Increased costs for the successor owner, management
or leaseholder that result from such a change shall not be recognized for purposes of
reimbursement;
(2) In the case of a newly built facility or part thereof which is less than two years of
age and enters the Title XIX program under this chapter after July 1, 1983, a reimbursement
rate shall be assigned based on the lesser of projected estimated operating costs or one
hundred ten percent of the median rate for the facility's class to include urban and rural
categories for each level of care including ICF only and SNF/ICF. The rates set under this
provision shall be effective for a period of twelve months from the effective date of the
provider agreement at which time the rate for the future year shall be set in accordance with
reported costs of the facility recognized under the reimbursement plan and as provided in
subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection. Rates set under this section may in no case exceed
the maximum ceiling amounts in effect under the reimbursement regulation;
(3) Reimbursement for capital related expenses for newly built facilities entering the
Title XIX program after March 18, 1983, shall be calculated as the building and building
equipment rate, movable equipment rate, land rate, and working capital rate.
(a) The building and building equipment rate will be the lower of:
a. Actual acquisition costs, which is the original cost to construct or acquire the
building, not to exceed the costs as determined in section 197.357; or
b. Reasonable construction or acquisition cost computed by applying the regional
Dodge Construction Index for 1981 with a trend factor, if necessary, or another current
construction cost measure multiplied by one hundred eight percent as an allowance for fees
authorized as architectural or legal not included in the Dodge Index Value, multiplied by the
square footage of the facility not to exceed three hundred twenty-five square feet per bed,
multiplied by the ratio of forty minus the actual years of the age of the facility divided by

HB 1637 4
forty; and multiplied by a return rate of twelve percent; and divided by ninety-three percent of
the facility's total available beds times three hundred sixty-five days.
(b) The maximum movable equipment rate will be fifty-three cents per bed day.
(c) The maximum allowable land area is defined as five acres for a facility with one
hundred or less beds and one additional acre for each additional one hundred beds or fraction
thereof for a facility with one hundred one or more beds.
(d) The land rate will be calculated as:
a. For facilities with land areas at or below the maximum allowable land area,
multiply the acquisition cost of the land by the return rate of twelve percent, divide by ninety-
three percent of the facility's total available beds times three hundred sixty-five days.
b. For facilities with land areas greater than the maximum allowable land area, divide
the acquisition cost of the land by the total acres, multiply by the maximum allowable land
area, multiply by the return rate of twelve percent, divide by ninety-three percent of the
facility's total available beds times three hundred sixty-five days.
(e) The maximum working capital rate will be twenty cents per day;
(4) If a provider does not provide the actual acquisition cost to determine a
reimbursement rate under subparagraph a. of paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of subsection 1
of this section, the sum of the building and building equipment rate, movable equipment rate,
land rate, and working capital rate shall be set at a reimbursement rate of six dollars;
(5)] , for each state fiscal year a negotiated trend factor shall be applied to each
facility's Title XIX per diem reimbursement rate. The trend factor shall be determined
through negotiations between the department and the affected providers and is intended to
hold the providers harmless against increase in cost. In no circumstances shall the negotiated
trend factor to be applied to state funds exceed the health care finance administration market
basket price index for that year. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to fiscal year
1996 and thereafter.
[2. The provisions of subdivisions (1), (2), (3), and (4) of subsection 1 of this section
shall remain in effect until July 1, 1989, unless otherwise provided by law.]
208.225. 1. To implement fully the provisions of section 208.152, the MO HealthNet
division shall calculate the Medicaid per diem reimbursement rates of each nursing home
participating in the Medicaid program as a provider of nursing home services based on its
costs reported in the Title XIX cost report filed with the MO HealthNet division for its fiscal
year as provided in subsection 2 of this section.
2. The recalculation of Medicaid rates to all Missouri facilities will be performed as
follows: effective July 1, 2004, the department of social services shall use the Medicaid cost
report containing adjusted costs for the facility fiscal year ending in 2001 and redetermine the
allowable per-patient day costs for each facility. The department shall recalculate the class

HB 1637 5
ceilings in the patient care, one hundred twenty percent of the median; ancillary, one hundred
twenty percent of the median; and administration, one hundred ten percent of the median cost
centers. Each facility shall receive as a rate increase one-third of the amount that is unpaid
based on the recalculated cost determination.
3. (1) For purposes of this subsection, the term "capital expenditures" means
expenditures by or on behalf of a facility that, under generally accepted accounting
principles, are not properly chargeable as an expense of operation and maintenance.
(2) Any intermediate care facility or skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined
in section 198.006, participating in MO HealthNet that incurs total capital expenditures[, as
such term is defined in section 197.305,] in excess of two thousand dollars per bed shall be
entitled to obtain from the MO HealthNet division a recalculation of its Medicaid per diem
reimbursement rate based on its additional capital costs or all costs incurred during the facility
fiscal year during which such capital expenditures were made. Such recalculated
reimbursement rate shall become effective and payable when granted by the MO
HealthNet division as of the date of application for a rate adjustment.
[197.300. Sections 197.300 to 197.366 shall be known as the
"Missouri Certificate of Need Law".]
[197.305. As used in sections 197.300 to 197.366, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Affected persons", the person proposing the development of a
new institutional health service, the public to be served, and health care
facilities within the service area in which the proposed new health care service
is to be developed;
(2) "Agency", the certificate of need program of the Missouri
department of health and senior services;
(3) "Capital expenditure", an expenditure by or on behalf of a health
care facility which, under generally accepted accounting principles, is not
properly chargeable as an expense of operation and maintenance;
(4) "Certificate of need", a written certificate issued by the committee
setting forth the committee's affirmative finding that a proposed project
sufficiently satisfies the criteria prescribed for such projects by sections
197.300 to 197.366;
(5) "Develop", to undertake those activities which on their completion
will result in the offering of a new institutional health service or the incurring
of a financial obligation in relation to the offering of such a service;
(6) "Expenditure minimum" shall mean:
(a) For beds in existing or proposed health care facilities licensed
pursuant to chapter 198 and long-term care beds in a hospital as described in
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 198.012, six hundred thousand
dollars in the case of capital expenditures, or four hundred thousand dollars in
the case of major medical equipment, provided, however, that prior to January
1, 2003, the expenditure minimum for beds in such a facility and long-term

HB 1637 6
care beds in a hospital described in section 198.012 shall be zero, subject to the
provisions of subsection 7 of section 197.318;
(b) For beds or equipment in a long-term care hospital meeting the
requirements described in 42 CFR, Section 412.23(e), the expenditure
minimum shall be zero; and
(c) For health care facilities, new institutional health services or beds
not described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subdivision one million dollars in
the case of capital expenditures, excluding major medical equipment, and one
million dollars in the case of medical equipment;
(7) "Health service area", a geographic region appropriate for the
effective planning and development of health services, determined on the basis
of factors including population and the availability of resources, consisting of
a population of not less than five hundred thousand or more than three million;
(8) "Major medical equipment", medical equipment used for the
provision of medical and other health services;
(9) "New institutional health service":
(a) The development of a new health care facility costing in excess of
the applicable expenditure minimum;
(b) The acquisition, including acquisition by lease, of any health care
facility, or major medical equipment costing in excess of the expenditure
minimum;
(c) Any capital expenditure by or on behalf of a health care facility in
excess of the expenditure minimum;
(d) Predevelopment activities as defined in subdivision (12) hereof
costing in excess of one hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(e) Any change in licensed bed capacity of a health care facility
licensed under chapter 198 which increases the total number of beds by more
than ten or more than ten percent of total bed capacity, whichever is less, over
a two-year period, provided that any such health care facility seeking a
nonapplicability review for an increase in total beds or total bed capacity in an
amount less than described in this paragraph shall be eligible for such review
only if the facility has had no patient care class I deficiencies within the last
eighteen months and has maintained at least an eighty-five percent average
occupancy rate for the previous six quarters;
(f) Health services, excluding home health services, which are offered
in a health care facility and which were not offered on a regular basis in such
health care facility within the twelve-month period prior to the time such
services would be offered;
(g) A reallocation by an existing health care facility of licensed beds
among major types of service or reallocation of licensed beds from one
physical facility or site to another by more than ten beds or more than ten
percent of total licensed bed capacity, whichever is less, over a two-year
period;
(10) "Nonsubstantive projects", projects which do not involve the
addition, replacement, modernization or conversion of beds or the provision of
a new health service but which include a capital expenditure which exceeds
the expenditure minimum and are due to an act of God or a normal
consequence of maintaining health care services, facility or equipment;

HB 1637 7
(11) "Person", any individual, trust, estate, partnership, corporation,
including associations and joint stock companies, state or political subdivision
or instrumentality thereof, including a municipal corporation;
(12) "Predevelopment activities", expenditures for architectural
designs, plans, working drawings and specifications, and any arrangement
or commitment made for financing; but excluding submission of an
application for a certificate of need.]
[197.310. 1. The "Missouri Health Facilities Review Committee" is
hereby established. The agency shall provide clerical and administrative
support to the committee. The committee may employ additional staff as it
deems necessary.
2. The committee shall be composed of:
(1) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro tem,
who shall be from different political parties; and
(2) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker, who shall be from different political parties; and
(3) Five members appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate, not more than three of whom shall be from the same
political party.
3. No business of this committee shall be performed without a
majority of the full body.
4. The members shall be appointed as soon as possible after September
28, 1979. One of the senate members, one of the house members and three of
the members appointed by the governor shall serve until January 1, 1981, and
the remaining members shall serve until January 1, 1982. All subsequent
members shall be appointed in the manner provided in subsection 2 of this
section and shall serve terms of two years.
5. The committee shall elect a chairman at its first meeting which shall
be called by the governor. The committee shall meet upon the call of the
chairman or the governor.
6. The committee shall review and approve or disapprove all
applications for a certificate of need made under sections 197.300 to 197.366.
It shall issue reasonable rules and regulations governing the submission,
review and disposition of applications.
7. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties.
8. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 4 of section 610.025,
the proceedings and records of the facilities review committee shall be subject
to the provisions of chapter 610.]
[197.311. No member of the Missouri health facilities review
committee may accept a political donation from any applicant for a license.]
[197.312. A certificate of need shall not be required for any institution
previously owned and operated for or in behalf of a city not within a county
which chooses to be licensed as a facility defined under subdivision (22) or

HB 1637 8
(23) of section 198.006 for a facility of ninety beds or less that is owned or
operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from federal income
tax as an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, which is controlled directly by a religious organization and
which has received approval by the department of health and senior services of
plans for construction of such facility by August 1, 1995, and is licensed by the
department of health and senior services by July 1, 1996, as a facility defined
under subdivision (22) or (23) of section 198.006 or for a facility, serving
exclusively mentally ill, homeless persons, of sixteen beds or less that is
owned or operated by a not-for-profit corporation which is exempt from
federal income tax which is described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, which is controlled directly by a religious organization
and which has received approval by the department of health and senior
services of plans for construction of such facility by May 1, 1996, and is
licensed by the department of health and senior services by July 1, 1996, as a
facility defined under subdivision (22) or (23) of section 198.006 or an assisted
living facility located in a city not within a county operated by a not for profit
corporation which is exempt from federal income tax which is described in
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, which is controlled
directly by a religious organization and which is licensed for one hundred beds
or less on or before August 28, 1997.]
[197.315. 1. Any person who proposes to develop or offer a new
institutional health service within the state must obtain a certificate of need
from the committee prior to the time such services are offered.
2. Only those new institutional health services which are found by the
committee to be needed shall be granted a certificate of need. Only those new
institutional health services which are granted certificates of need shall be
offered or developed within the state. No expenditures for new institutional
health services in excess of the applicable expenditure minimum shall be made
by any person unless a certificate of need has been granted.
3. After October 1, 1980, no state agency charged by statute to license
or certify health care facilities shall issue a license to or certify any such
facility, or distinct part of such facility, that is developed without obtaining a
certificate of need.
4. If any person proposes to develop any new institutional health care
service without a certificate of need as required by sections 197.300 to
197.366, the committee shall notify the attorney general, and he shall apply for
an injunction or other appropriate legal action in any court of this state against
that person.
5. After October 1, 1980, no agency of state government may
appropriate or grant funds to or make payment of any funds to any person or
health care facility which has not first obtained every certificate of need
required pursuant to sections 197.300 to 197.366.
6. A certificate of need shall be issued only for the premises and
persons named in the application and is not transferable except by consent of
the committee.

HB 1637 9
7. Project cost increases, due to changes in the project application as
approved or due to project change orders, exceeding the initial estimate by
more than ten percent shall not be incurred without consent of the committee.
8. Periodic reports to the committee shall be required of any applicant
who has been granted a certificate of need until the project has been
completed. The committee may order the forfeiture of the certificate of need
upon failure of the applicant to file any such report.
9. A certificate of need shall be subject to forfeiture for failure to incur
a capital expenditure on any approved project within six months after the date
of the order. The applicant may request an extension from the committee of
not more than six additional months based upon substantial expenditure made.
10. Each application for a certificate of need must be accompanied by
an application fee. The time of filing commences with the receipt of the
application and the application fee. The application fee is one thousand
dollars, or one-tenth of one percent of the total cost of the proposed project,
whichever is greater. All application fees shall be deposited in the state
treasury. Because of the loss of federal funds, the general assembly will
appropriate funds to the Missouri health facilities review committee.
11. In determining whether a certificate of need should be granted, no
consideration shall be given to the facilities or equipment of any other health
care facility located more than a fifteen-mile radius from the applying facility.
12. When a nursing facility shifts from a skilled to an intermediate
level of nursing care, it may return to the higher level of care if it meets the
licensure requirements, without obtaining a certificate of need.
13. In no event shall a certificate of need be denied because the
applicant refuses to provide abortion services or information.
14. A certificate of need shall not be required for the transfer of
ownership of an existing and operational health facility in its entirety.
15. A certificate of need may be granted to a facility for an expansion,
an addition of services, a new institutional service, or for a new hospital
facility which provides for something less than that which was sought in the
application.
16. The provisions of this section shall not apply to facilities operated
by the state, and appropriation of funds to such facilities by the general
assembly shall be deemed in compliance with this section, and such facilities
shall be deemed to have received an appropriate certificate of need without
payment of any fee or charge. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply to hospitals operated by the state and licensed under this chapter, except
for department of mental health state-operated psychiatric hospitals.
17. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a certificate of
need may be issued after July 1, 1983, for an intermediate care facility
operated exclusively for the intellectually disabled.
18. To assure the safe, appropriate, and cost-effective transfer of new
medical technology throughout the state, a certificate of need shall not be
required for the purchase and operation of:
(1) Research equipment that is to be used in a clinical trial that has
received written approval from a duly constituted institutional review board of
an accredited school of medicine or osteopathy located in Missouri to establish

HB 1637 10
its safety and efficacy and does not increase the bed complement of the
institution in which the equipment is to be located. After the clinical trial has
been completed, a certificate of need must be obtained for continued use in
such facility; or
(2) Equipment that is to be used by an academic health center operated
by the state in furtherance of its research or teaching missions.]
[197.316. 1. The provisions of subsection 10 of section 197.315 and
sections 197.317 and 197.318 shall not apply to facilities which are licensed
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 198, which are designed and operated
exclusively for the care and treatment of persons with acquired human
immunodeficiency syndrome, AIDS.
2. If a facility is granted a certificate of need and is found to be exempt
from the provisions of subsection 10 of section 197.315 and sections 197.317
and 197.318 pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, then
only AIDS patients shall be residents of such facility and no others.
3. Any facility that violates the provisions of subsection 2 of this
section shall be liable for a fine of one hundred dollars per resident per day for
each such violation.
4. The attorney general shall, upon request of the department of health
and senior services, bring an action in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction
for violation of this section.]
[197.318. 1. As used in this section, the term "licensed and available"
means beds which are actually in place and for which a license has been
issued.
2. The committee shall review all letters of intent and applications for
long-term care hospital beds meeting the requirements described in 42 CFR,
Section 412.23(e) under its criteria and standards for long-term care beds.
3. Sections 197.300 to 197.366 shall not be construed to apply to
litigation pending in state court on or before April 1, 1996, in which the
Missouri health facilities review committee is a defendant in an action
concerning the application of sections 197.300 to 197.366 to long-term care
hospital beds meeting the requirements described in 42 CFR, Section 412.23
(e).
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary:
(1) A facility licensed pursuant to chapter 198 may increase its
licensed bed capacity by:
(a) Submitting a letter of intent to expand to the department of health
and senior services and the health facilities review committee;
(b) Certification from the department of health and senior services that
the facility:
a. Has no patient care class I deficiencies within the last eighteen
months; and
b. Has maintained a ninety-percent average occupancy rate for the
previous six quarters;
(c) Has made an effort to purchase beds for eighteen months following
the date the letter of intent to expand is submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of

HB 1637 11
this subdivision. For purposes of this paragraph, an "effort to purchase" means
a copy certified by the offeror as an offer to purchase beds from another
licensed facility in the same licensure category; and
(d) If an agreement is reached by the selling and purchasing entities,
the health facilities review committee shall issue a certificate of need for the
expansion of the purchaser facility upon surrender of the seller's license; or
(e) If no agreement is reached by the selling and purchasing entities,
the health facilities review committee shall permit an expansion for:
a. A facility with more than forty beds may expand its licensed bed
capacity within the same licensure category by twenty-five percent or thirty
beds, whichever is greater, if that same licensure category in such facility has
experienced an average occupancy of ninety-three percent or greater over the
previous six quarters;
b. A facility with fewer than forty beds may expand its licensed bed
capacity within the same licensure category by twenty-five percent or ten beds,
whichever is greater, if that same licensure category in such facility has
experienced an average occupancy of ninety-two percent or greater over the
previous six quarters;
c. A facility adding beds pursuant to subparagraphs a. or b. of this
paragraph shall not expand by more than fifty percent of its then licensed bed
capacity in the qualifying licensure category;
(2) Any beds sold shall, for five years from the date of relicensure by
the purchaser, remain unlicensed and unused for any long-term care service in
the selling facility, whether they do or do not require a license;
(3) The beds purchased shall, for two years from the date of purchase,
remain in the bed inventory attributed to the selling facility and be considered
by the department of social services as licensed and available for purposes of
this section;
(4) Any residential care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 198 may
relocate any portion of such facility's current licensed beds to any other facility
to be licensed within the same licensure category if both facilities are under the
same licensure ownership or control, and are located within six miles of each
other;
(5) A facility licensed pursuant to chapter 198 may transfer or sell
individual long-term care licensed beds to facilities qualifying pursuant to
paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection. Any facility which
transfers or sells licensed beds shall not expand its licensed bed capacity in
that licensure category for a period of five years from the date the licensure is
relinquished.
5. Any existing licensed and operating health care facility offering
long-term care services may replace one-half of its licensed beds at the same
site or a site not more than thirty miles from its current location if, for at least
the most recent four consecutive calendar quarters, the facility operates only
fifty percent of its then licensed capacity with every resident residing in a
private room. In such case:
(1) The facility shall report to the health and senior services vacant
beds as unavailable for occupancy for at least the most recent four consecutive
calendar quarters;

HB 1637 12
(2) The replacement beds shall be built to private room specifications
and only used for single occupancy; and
(3) The existing facility and proposed facility shall have the same
owner or owners, regardless of corporate or business structure, and such owner
or owners shall stipulate in writing that the existing facility beds to be replaced
will not later be used to provide long-term care services. If the facility is being
operated under a lease, both the lessee and the owner of the existing facility
shall stipulate the same in writing.
6. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care facility licensed
pursuant to chapter 198 from being replaced in its entirety within fifteen miles
of its existing site so long as the existing facility and proposed or replacement
facility have the same owner or owners regardless of corporate or business
structure and the health care facility being replaced remains unlicensed and
unused for any long-term care services whether they do or do not require a
license from the date of licensure of the replacement facility.]
[197.320. The committee shall have the power to promulgate
reasonable rules, regulations, criteria and standards in conformity with this
section and chapter 536 to meet the objectives of sections 197.300 to 197.366
including the power to establish criteria and standards to review new types of
equipment or service. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in sections
197.300 to 197.366 shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. All rulemaking authority delegated prior to August 28, 1999, is of no
force and effect and repealed. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
repeal or affect the validity of any rule filed or adopted prior to August 28,
1999, if it fully complied with all applicable provisions of law. This section
and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date
or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 1999, shall be invalid and void.]
[197.325. Any person who proposes to develop or offer a new
institutional health service shall submit a letter of intent to the committee at
least thirty days prior to the filing of the application.]
[197.326. 1. Any person who is paid either as part of his or her normal
employment or as a lobbyist to support or oppose any project before the health
facilities review committee shall register as a lobbyist pursuant to chapter 105
and shall also register with the staff of the health facilities review committee
for every project in which such person has an interest and indicate whether
such person supports or opposes the named project. The registration shall also
include the names and addresses of any person, firm, corporation or
association that the person registering represents in relation to the named
project. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be subject
to the penalties specified in section 105.478.

HB 1637 13
2. A member of the general assembly who also serves as a member of
the health facilities review committee is prohibited from soliciting or accepting
campaign contributions from any applicant or person speaking for an applicant
or any opponent to any application or persons speaking for any opponent while
such application is pending before the health facilities review committee.
3. Any person regulated by chapter 197 or 198 and any officer,
attorney, agent and employee thereof, shall not offer to any committee member
or to any person employed as staff to the committee, any office, appointment
or position, or any present, gift, entertainment or gratuity of any kind or any
campaign contribution while such application is pending before the health
facilities review committee. Any person guilty of knowingly violating the
provisions of this section shall be punished as follows: For the first offense,
such person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor; and for the second and
subsequent offenses, such person is guilty of a class E felony.]
[197.327. 1. If a facility is granted a certificate of need pursuant to
sections 197.300 to 197.365 based on an application stating a need for
additional Medicaid beds, such beds shall be used for Medicaid patients and no
other.
2. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section shall be liable to the state for civil penalties of one hundred dollars for
every day of such violation. Each nonMedicaid patient placed in a Medicaid
bed shall constitute a separate violation.
3. The attorney general shall, upon the request of the department, bring
an action in a circuit court of competent jurisdiction to recover the civil
penalty. The department may bring such an action itself. The civil action may
be brought in the circuit court of Cole County or, at the option of the director,
in another county which has venue of an action against the person under other
provisions of law.]
[197.330. 1. The committee shall:
(1) Notify the applicant within fifteen days of the date of filing of an
application as to the completeness of such application;
(2) Provide written notification to affected persons located within this
state at the beginning of a review. This notification may be given through
publication of the review schedule in all newspapers of general circulation in
the area to be served;
(3) Hold public hearings on all applications when a request in writing
is filed by any affected person within thirty days from the date of publication
of the notification of review;
(4) Within one hundred days of the filing of any application for a
certificate of need, issue in writing its findings of fact, conclusions of law, and
its approval or denial of the certificate of need; provided, that the committee
may grant an extension of not more than thirty days on its own initiative or
upon the written request of any affected person;
(5) Cause to be served upon the applicant, the respective health system
agency, and any affected person who has filed his prior request in writing, a
copy of the aforesaid findings, conclusions and decisions;

HB 1637 14
(6) Consider the needs and circumstances of institutions providing
training programs for health personnel;
(7) Provide for the availability, based on demonstrated need, of both
medical and osteopathic facilities and services to protect the freedom of patient
choice; and
(8) Establish by regulation procedures to review, or grant a waiver
from review, nonsubstantive projects.

The term "filed" or "filing" as used in this section shall mean delivery to the
staff of the health facilities review committee the document or documents the
applicant believes constitute an application.
2. Failure by the committee to issue a written decision on an
application for a certificate of need within the time required by this section
shall constitute approval of and final administrative action on the application,
and is subject to appeal pursuant to section 197.335 only on the question of
approval by operation of law.]
[197.335. Within thirty days of the decision of the committee, the
applicant may file an appeal to be heard de novo by the administrative hearing
commissioner, the circuit court of Cole County or the circuit court in the
county within which such health care service or facility is proposed to be
developed.]
[197.340. Any health facility providing a health service must notify
the committee of any discontinuance of any previously provided health care
service, a decrease in the number of licensed beds by ten percent or more, or
the change in licensure category for any such facility.]
[197.345. Any health facility with a project for facilities or services for
which a binding construction or purchase contract has been executed prior to
October 1, 1980, or health care facility which has commenced operations prior
to October 1, 1980, shall be deemed to have received a certificate of need,
except that such certificate of need shall be subject to forfeiture under the
provisions of subsections 8 and 9 of section 197.315.]
[197.355. The legislature may not appropriate any money for capital
expenditures for health care facilities until a certificate of need has been issued
for such expenditures.]
[197.357. For the purposes of reimbursement under section 208.152,
project costs for new institutional health services in excess of ten percent of
the initial project estimate whether or not approval was obtained under
subsection 7 of section 197.315 shall not be eligible for reimbursement for the
first three years that a facility receives payment for services provided under
section 208.152. The initial estimate shall be that amount for which the
original certificate of need was obtained or, in the case of facilities for which a
binding construction or purchase contract was executed prior to October 1,
1980, the amount of that contract. Reimbursement for these excess costs after

HB 1637 15
the first three years shall not be made until a certificate of need has been
granted for the excess project costs. The provisions of this section shall apply
only to facilities which file an application for a certificate of need or make
application for cost-overrun review of their original application or waiver after
August 13, 1982.]
[197.366. The term "health care facilities" in sections 197.300 to
197.366 shall mean:
(1) Facilities licensed under chapter 198;
(2) Long-term care beds in a hospital as described in subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 198.012;
(3) Long-term care hospitals or beds in a long-term care hospital
meeting the requirements described in 42 CFR, section 412.23(e); and
(4) Construction of a new hospital as defined in chapter 197.]
[197.367. Upon application for renewal by any residential care facility
or assisted living facility which on the effective date of this act has been
licensed for more than five years, is licensed for more than fifty beds and fails
to maintain for any calendar year its occupancy level above thirty percent of its
then licensed beds, the department of health and senior services shall license
only fifty beds for such facility.]
✔